Georgia, session 2025_26, HB475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-7-40.26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income tax
credits for film, gaming, video, or digital production, is amended by revising paragraph (11)
of subsection (b) as follows:
"(11) 'Qualified production activities' means the production of new film, video, or digital
projects produced in this state and approved by the Department of Economic
Development as state certified productions, including only the following: feature films,
series, pilots, movies for television, televised commercial advertisements, music videos,
interactive entertainment, or prereleased interactive games. Such activities shall include
H. B. 475
- 1 -

HB 475/AP
projects recorded in this state, in whole or in part, in either short or long form, animation
and music, fixed on a delivery system which includes without limitation film, videotape,
computer disc, laser disc, and any element of the digital domain, from which the program
is viewed or reproduced, and which is intended for multimarket commercial distribution
via theaters, video on demand, direct to DVD, digital platforms designed for the
distribution of interactive games, licensing for exhibition by individual television stations,
groups of stations, networks, advertiser supported sites, paid subscription based
platforms, free advertiser supported streaming television (FAST) channels, cable
television stations, or public broadcasting stations. Such term shall not include the
coverage of news or athletic events, local interest programming, instructional videos,
corporate videos, any project that is not intended for multimarket commercial
distribution, user-generated content distributed exclusively via social media platforms,
or any project not shot, recorded, or originally created in Georgia."
SECTION 2.
Said Code section is further amended by revising subsection (i) as follows:
"(i)(1) The Department of Economic Development shall determine through the
promulgation of rules and regulations what projects qualify for the tax credits authorized
under this Code section. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to,
certification application deadlines, qualified project content types and distribution
methods, certification application process and required supporting documentation, and
certification application fees. Certification shall be submitted to the state revenue
commissioner.
(2) The Department of Economic Development may charge reasonable fees associated
with the certification process established pursuant to this subsection and such fees shall be
remitted to the state general fund.
H. B. 475
- 2 -

HB 475/AP
(3) If the Department of Economic Development prevails in the litigation of an appeal
on the denial of certification, the plaintiff production company shall pay all court costs
associated with such litigation."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to taxable years
beginning on or after such date.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 475
- 3 -